District of Columbia statutes.
50-2406

Rules.

Within 90 days from September 9, 1989, the Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue rules to implement the provisions of this act. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

History

Sept. 9, 1989, D.C. Law 8-24, § 11, 36 DCR 4575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-836.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) provisions for the removal and disposition of abandoned, dangerous, and unlawfully parked vehicles, see §§ 2 to 12, 14, and 15 of the Removal and Disposition of Abandoned, Dangerous and Other Unlawfully Parked Vehicles Reform Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 15-104, June 20, 2003, 50 DCR 5534).

Effective Dates

Section 12 of D.C. Law 8-24 provided that the act shall take effect after a 30-day period of Congressional review following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the Mayor, action by the Council of the District of Columbia to override the veto) as provided in § 1-206.02(c)(1), and publication in either the District of Columbia Register, the District of Columbia Statutes-at-Large, or the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations; or by November 1, 1989, whichever occurs later. D.C. Law 8-24 was effective September 9, 1989.

References in Text

“This act”, referred to in the first sentence, is D.C. Law 8-24.